Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 1
COUNTY BOUNDARIES AND COUNTY SEATS

Sec.

§ 31-101. State divided into counties.

The state is divided into the several counties in this chapter named and described. The county seats are located at the cities or villages named after the respective county descriptions.

§ 31-102. Definition of descriptive terms.

The words, “range,” “township” and “section” as employed in this chapter refer to the Boise meridian and base line of the United States survey, except in such cases as the word “range” obviously refers to a range of mountains. In the description of courses the words, “north,” “south,” “east” and “west” refer to true courses.

§ 31-103. Ada county.

Ada county is described as follows: beginning at a point in the center of the channel of the Boise river where the section line between sections fifteen (15) and sixteen (16), township three (3) north, range four (4) east, crosses said Boise river;

Northern boundary. Thence down the center of the channel of the Boise river to a point opposite the mouth of More’s creek. Thence in a straight line north forty-four (44) degrees and thirty-eight (38) minutes west until the said line intersects the north line of township five (5) north (12 Ter. Sess. 67); thence west to the northwest corner of township five (5) north, range one (1) west;

Western boundary. Thence south to the northwest corner of township three (3) north, range one (1) west; thence east to the northwest corner of section four (4), township three (3) north, range one (1) west; thence south to the southeast corner of section thirty-two (32), township two (2) north, range one (1) west; thence west to the northwest corner of township one (1) north, range one (1) west; thence south to the point in the middle of the channel of Snake river, where the line between township one (1) south, range one (1) west, and township one (1) south [, range two (2) west, crosses the said river];

Southern boundary. Thence southeasterly up the center of the channel of the said Snake river to a point where the section line between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township five (5) south, range four (4) east crosses the said Snake river;

Eastern boundary. Beginning at a point in the center of the channel of the Snake river where the section line between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township five (5) south, range four (4) east, Boise meridian, crosses said Snake river; thence extending in a northerly direction along the north and south center line of townships five (5), four (4), three (3), two (2) and one (1) south, range four (4) east, Boise meridian, to the base line and thence in a northerly direction along the north and south center line of townships one (1), two (2) and three (3) north, range four (4) east, Boise meridian, to a point in the center of the channel of the Boise river where the section line between sections fifteen (15) and sixteen (16), township three (3) north, range four (4) east, Boise meridian, crosses said Boise river, the point of beginning.

County seat — Boise City.

§ 31-104. Adams county.

Adams county is described as follows: beginning at a point on the boundary line between the states of Idaho and Oregon, the same being the middle of the center channel of Snake river, three thousand nine hundred sixty (3,960) feet in a southwesterly direction from the mouth of Wildhorse river;

Southern boundary. Then in an easterly direction fifteen and one-half (15 ½) miles to a point one-half mile east of the west quarter corner, section six (6), township seventeen (17) north, range two (2) west; thence south about twelve (12) miles to the intersection of said line with Cow creek; thence southeast down the center line of Cow creek to its confluence with the Weiser river; thence south across the Weiser river to a point five hundred (500) feet east of the north quarter corner of section twenty-nine (29), township fifteen (15) north, range two (2) west; thence east about three and three-quarters (3 ¾) miles to a point one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet east of the northwest corner of section twenty-five (25), said township and range; thence south eight and one-half (8 ½) miles to a point one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet east of the west quarter corner of section one (1), township thirteen (13) north, range two (2) west; thence in a southeasterly direction six and one-half (6 ½) miles to a point one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet south and one thousand three hundred twenty (1,320) feet east of the west quarter corner of section twenty-four (24), township thirteen (13) north, range one (1) west; thence east (1911, ch. 31, section 2, pp. 67, 68) to the summit dividing the waters of the Payette and Weiser rivers;

Eastern boundary. Thence along said divide in a northerly direction to a point on said divide known as Big Rock Flat, where the waters flow into the Little Salmon; thence in a northeasterly direction on a low divide separating the waters of the Little Salmon and Payette rivers to a point east of the northern point of Little Salmon Meadows;

Northern boundary. Thence west to the Little Salmon river; thence down the Little Salmon river to a point east of the point where the section line between sections six (6) and seven (7), township twenty-two (22) north, range one (1) east, intersects said meridian; thence west to the middle of the main channel of Snake river (R.C., section 23w), the same being the boundary line between the states of Idaho and Oregon;

Western boundary. Thence in a southerly direction following said boundary line between said states of Idaho and Oregon, to the point of beginning (1911, ch. 31, section 2, p. 68).

County seat — Council.

§ 31-105. Bannock county.

Bannock county is described as follows: beginning at the intersection of the township line between townships four (4) and five (5) south, with the Snake river;

Western boundary. Thence down the Snake river southwesterly to the mouth of Portneuf river; thence up the Portneuf river to the intersection of the Portneuf river with the west boundary of section eight (8), township six (6) south, range thirty-four (34) east Boise meridian; thence south four and one-quarter (4 ¼) miles to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range thirty-four (34) east Boise meridian; thence west to the northeast corner of section six (6), township seven (7) south, range thirty-four (34) east, Boise meridian; thence south four (4) miles to the southeast corner of section nineteen (19); thence east one (1) mile to the northeast corner of section twenty-nine (29); thence south four (4) miles to the southeast corner of section eight (8) township eight (8) south, range thirty-four (34) east Boise meridian; thence east two (2) miles to the northeast corner of section fifteen (15); thence south two and one-half (2 ½) miles to the east quarter (E¼) corner of section twenty-seven (27); thence east one (1) mile to the east quarter (E¼) corner of section twenty-six (26); thence south one and one-half (1 ½) miles to the southeast corner of section thirty-five (35), township eight (8) south, range thirty-four (34) east Boise meridian; thence east one (1) mile to the northeast corner of section one (1), township nine (9) south, range thirty-four (34) east, Boise meridian; thence south two (2) miles to the southeast corner of section twelve (12); thence east two (2) miles to the northeast corner of section seventeen (17), township nine (9) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence south one and one-half (1 ½) miles to the east quarter (E¼) corner of section twenty (20); thence west one-half (½) mile to the center of section twenty (20); thence south two and one-half (2 ½) miles to the south quarter (S¼) corner of section thirty-two (32), township nine (9) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence east to the northeast corner of section five (5), township ten (10) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence south one and one-quarter (1 ¼) miles to the southeast corner of the northeast quarter (NE¼) of the northeast quarter (NE¼) of section eight (8); thence west one-quarter (¼) mile; thence south one-quarter (¼) mile; thence west one and one-quarter (1 ¼) miles; thence south three-quarters (¾) of a mile; thence west one-quarter (¼) mile to the southwest corner of lot one (1) of section eighteen (18), township ten (10) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence south on the range line three and three-quarter (3 ¾) miles to the southwest corner of township ten (10) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence east one and three-quarters (1 ¾) miles to the northwest corner of section four (4), township eleven (11) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence south one (1) mile to the northwest corner of section nine (9); thence east one-quarter (¼) mile; thence south one-half (½) mile; thence east one-half (½) mile; thence south one-half (½) mile; thence east one-quarter (¼) mile to the northwest corner of section fifteen (15); thence south one-half (½) mile to the west one-quarter (¼) corner of section fifteen (15); thence east one (1) mile; thence south one-half (½) mile to the northwest corner of section twenty-three (23), township eleven (11) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence following the unbroken crest of the main mountain range to the southeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township eleven (11) south, range thirty-five (35) east, Boise meridian; thence southerly and easterly along the crest of the mountains between Malad and Marsh valleys to a point on the north and south center line of section thirty-three (33), township twelve (12) south, range thirty-six (36) east, Boise meridian; thence north to the center line of section twenty-eight (28), township twelve (12) south, range thirty-six (36) east, Boise meridian; thence east three and one-half (3 ½) miles through the center of sections twenty-seven (27), twenty-six (26) and twenty-five (25) to the east quarter (E¼) corner of section twenty-five (25), township twelve (12) south, range thirty-six (36) east, Boise meridian; thence south between ranges thirty-six (36) and thirty-seven (37) east, Boise meridian; to the top of the crest of the mountains between Malad and Marsh valleys; thence in an easterly and southerly direction on the crest of the mountains between Malad and Marsh valleys to a point on the Oxford mountain range where the same is intersected by the one-sixteenth (1/16) section line, eighty (80) rods, more or less, south of the township line between township thirteen (13) and fourteen (14) south.
Southern boundary. Thence east to the southeast corner of lot one (1), section four (4), township fourteen (14) south, range thirty-nine (39) east, Boise meridian; thence north six and one-quarter (6 ¼) miles to the northwest corner of section three (3), township thirteen (13) south, range thirty-nine (39) east, Boise meridian; thence east on township line sixteen and one-quarter (16 ¼) miles, more or less, to the summit of the Bear River range.

Eastern boundary. Thence north following the unbroken crest of the Bear River range to its intersection with the township line between townships nine (9) and ten (10) south; thence west on the township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-two (32), township nine (9) south, range forty-one (41) east, Boise meridian; thence north three (3) miles to the northwest corner of section twenty (20); thence west one (1) mile to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township nine (9) south, range forty-one (41) east, Boise meridian; thence north nine (9) miles to the northwest corner of section six (6), township eight (8) south, range forty-one (41) east, Boise meridian; thence west four (4) miles to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township seven (7) south, range forty (40) east, Boise meridian; thence north six (6) miles to the northwest corner of section four (4), township seven (7) south, range forty (40) east, Boise meridian; thence west one and one-half (1 ½) miles to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range forty (40) east, Boise meridian; thence north six (6) miles to the northwest corner of township six (6) south, range forty (40) east, Boise meridian; thence west six (6) miles to the southwest corner of township five (5) south, range thirty-nine (39) east, Boise meridian; thence north to the township line between townships four (4) and five (5) south.

Northern boundary. Thence west along said township line between townships four (4) and five (5) south to the place of beginning.

§ 31-106. Bear Lake county.

Bear Lake county is described as follows: beginning at the twenty-third (23d) mile post on the boundary line between Utah and Idaho;

Western boundary. Thence northerly along the summit of the range of mountains between Cache valley and Bear Lake valley to the corner of townships nine (9) and ten (10) south, range forty-one (41) east;

Northern boundary. Thence east twelve (12) miles; thence north to the summit of the divide between the waters of Bear river and the waters of Blackfoot river; thence easterly along said last named summit to the line between Wyoming and Idaho;

Eastern boundary. Thence south on said last named line to the southeast corner of Idaho;

Southern boundary. Thence west to the place of beginning.

County seat — Paris.

§ 31-107. Benewah county.

Benewah county is described as follows: beginning at the point of intersection of the Idaho-Washington state line with the north boundary line of township forty-six (46) north;

Western boundary. Thence south along said state line to the point of intersection of said state line with the north boundary line of the county of Latah, as now constituted;

Southern boundary. Thence in a southeasterly and easterly direction along said north boundary line of the county of Latah to the point of intersection of said north boundary line of Latah county with the west boundary line of the county of Shoshone, as the same is now constituted;

Eastern boundary. Thence along said west boundary line of Shoshone county to the point of intersection of said west boundary line of Shoshone county with the north boundary line of section twenty-two (22), township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) east;

Northern boundary. Thence west along the north boundary line of sections twenty-two (22), twenty-one (21), twenty (20) and nineteen (19), township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) east, to the point of intersection with the Boise meridian; thence along said Boise meridian to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) west; thence west along the north boundary line of sections twenty-four (24), twenty-three (23), twenty-two (22), twenty-one (21), twenty (20) and nineteen (19), township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) west, to the range line between township forty-seven (47) north, range one (1) west, and township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence along said last-mentioned range line to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence continuing west along the north boundary lines of sections twenty-four (24), twenty-three (23), twenty-two (22) to the northwest corner of section twenty-two (22), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence south along the west line of section twenty-two (22), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west, to the northwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence west along the north line of sections twenty-eight (28) and twenty-nine (29), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west, to the northwest corner of section twenty-nine (29), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence south along the west line of sections twenty-nine (29) and thirty-two (32), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-two (32), township forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west; thence west along the township line between townships forty-six (46) and forty-seven (47) north, range two (2) west, to the intersection of the range line between ranges two (2) and three (3) west; thence continuing west along the township line between townships forty-six (46) and forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west; thence north along the west line of section thirty-three (33), township forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west, to the northwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west; thence west along the north line of sections thirty-two (32) and thirty-one (31), township forty-seven (47) north, range three (3) west, to the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) west; thence south along the said range line to the northeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west; thence west along the north line of sections thirty-six (36) and thirty-five (35), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west, to the northwest corner of section thirty-five (35), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west; thence south along the west line of said section thirty-five (35), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west, to the southwest corner of said section thirty-five (35), township forty-seven (47) north, range four (4) west; thence west along the north line of township forty-six (46) north, ranges four (4), five (5), and six (6) west, to the point of beginning.
County seat — St. Maries.

§ 31-108. Bingham county.

Bingham county is described as follows: beginning at the northwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township six (6) south, range thirty (30) east:

Southern boundary. Thence east along the section line between sections thirty-one (31) and thirty (30), township and range aforesaid, and an extension thereof to the point where such extended line intersects with the center of the west channel of Snake river; thence up the center of the west channel of Snake river and the center of the main channel of Snake river to the intersection of the township line between townships four (4) and five (5) south; thence east along the said township line between townships four (4) and five (5) south to the southwest corner of township four (4) south, range forty-two (42) east;

Eastern boundary. Thence north along the range line between ranges forty-one (41) and forty-two (42) east to the southeast corner of township one (1) south, range forty-one (41) east;

Northern boundary. Thence west along the township line between township one (1) and township two (2) south, to the southwest corner of township one (1) south, range forty (40) east; thence north along the range line to the base line; thence west along the base line to the southwest corner of township one (1) north, range thirty-eight (38) east; thence north along the range line to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township one (1) north, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence west along section lines to the southwest corner of section fifteen (15), township one (1) north, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence north along the section line to the northwest corner of said section fifteen (15), township one (1) north, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence west, following the section lines to the range line between ranges thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34) east; thence north to the south line of Jefferson county; thence west along the south line of Jefferson county to the southeast corner of township four (4) north, range thirty-one (31) east; thence westerly along said township line seven and eighty-one hundredths (7.81) chains to the closing corner of sections three (3) and four (4), township three (3) north, range thirty-two (32) east, Boise meridian;

Western boundary. Thence south along section lines to the corner of sections three (3), four (4), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), townships two (2) and three (3) north, range thirty-two (32) east; thence west along the township line to the corner of townships two (2) and three (3) north, ranges thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) east, Boise meridian; thence south along the range line to the corner of township two (2) north, ranges thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) east, Boise meridian; thence west along the township line to the closing corner of sections three (3) and four (4), township one (1) north, range thirty (30) east; thence south along the section lines to the standard corner of sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township one (1) north, range thirty (30) east; thence west to closing corner of sections three (3) and four (4), township one (1) south, range thirty (30) east; thence south along section lines to the corner of sections three (3), four (4), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), townships one (1) and two (2) south, range thirty (30) east; thence west along said township line to the corner of townships one (1) and two (2) south, ranges twenty-nine (29) and thirty (30) east, Boise meridian; thence south along the range line between townships twenty-nine (29) and thirty (30) east, to place of beginning.

County seat — Blackfoot.

§ 31-109. Blaine county.

Blaine county is described as follows: beginning at the southeast corner of township two (2) south, range seventeen (17) east, thence east along the township line between townships two (2) and three (3) south, to the intersection of the same with the line between ranges twenty-five (25) and twenty-six (26) east; thence south along the said range line to the middle of the channel of Snake river; thence up the center of the said channel of Snake river to the point of intersection with the range line between ranges twenty-seven (27) and twenty-eight (28) east; thence north along and upon said range line to the northwest corner of township nine (9) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence east upon and along the north line of said township nine (9) south, to the northeast corner of section four (4), township nine (9) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence in a northerly direction along and upon the section line which when surveyed will be between sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township eight (8) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; and an extension of such line to the point where such extended line will intersect with the township line which when surveyed will be the township line between townships seven (7) and eight (8) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence west upon the township line to a point which when surveyed will be the southwest corner of township seven (7) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence north along and upon the range line which when surveyed will be the range line between ranges twenty-seven (27) and twenty-eight (28) east to a point which when surveyed and established will be the northwest corner of township four (4) south, range twenty-eight (28) east; thence east along and upon the north line of said township four (4) south to the northeast corner of township four (4) south, range twenty-nine (29) east; thence north along the range line between townships twenty-nine (29) and thirty (30) east, to the northeast corner of township two (2) south, range twenty-nine (29) east, thence west to what will be, when surveyed, the southwest corner of township one (1) south, range twenty-seven (27) east; thence north to what will be, when surveyed, the southwest corner of township one (1) north, range twenty-seven (27) east; thence west to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31) in township one (1) north, range twenty-four (24) east; thence north to the summit of the range of mountains dividing the headwaters of Fish creek, Cottonwood creek and Copper creek from the waters of Lava creek, Champagne creek and Antelope creek; thence northwesterly along the summit of said range of mountains to the southern boundary line of Custer county; thence westerly along and upon the summit of the range of mountains dividing the headwaters of the East Fork of the Salmon river from the waters of the Little and Big Wood rivers and continuing westerly on the said divide between the East Fork of the Salmon and Wood rivers to the intersection of the longitude line of longitude one hundred fourteen (114) degrees, forty (40) minutes west from Greenwich; thence north on said longitude line to a point on said divide due east of the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township seven (7) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence due west to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township seven (7) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence west along and upon the section lines to the corner of sections fifteen (15), sixteen (16), twenty-one (21) and twenty-two (22), township seven (7) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence north along and upon the section lines to the corner of sections three (3) and four (4) and thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township seven (7) and eight (8) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence north along and upon the section lines to the one-quarter (¼) section corner between sections twenty-seven (27) and twenty-eight (28), township eight (8) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence west along and upon the one-quarter (¼) section lines to the west one-quarter (¼) section corner of section thirty (30), township eight (8) north, range fourteen (14) east; thence southwesterly along and upon the summit of the mountains dividing the waters of Yellow Belly lake and Pettit lake to the summit of the Sawtooth mountains; thence following the summit of the said mountains to where the trail crosses the summit of what is known as Mattingly creek divide on the boundary line of Camas county; thence southeasterly along the boundary line of Camas county to the place of beginning.

County seat — Hailey.

§ 31-110. Boise county.

Boise county is described as follows: beginning at the confluence of Mores creek with the Boise river, at the center of the channel of Boise river;

Western boundary. Thence north forty-four (44) degrees and thirty-eight (38) minutes west (R.C., section 23f), until the said line intersects the north line of township five (5) north; thence east along the north boundary of township five (5) north to the northeast corner of township five (5) north, range one (1) east; thence north twenty-four (24) miles to the northeast corner of township nine (9) north, range one (1) east;

Northern boundary. Thence east (1915, ch. 165, section 2, p. 363) along the second (2) standard parallel north, to the center of the North Fork of the Payette river; thence northerly along the river to the intersection with the line between townships ten (10) and eleven (11) north; thence east to the ridge dividing the waters of the Salmon and Payette rivers (1917, ch. 99, section 2, p. 361); thence in an easterly direction along the divide which separates the waters of the Payette river and its tributaries from the waters of Salmon river and its tributaries (Special and Local Laws, 120), to the head of the Middle Fork of Salmon river;

Eastern boundary. Thence southerly along the divide which separates the water flowing into the South Payette river and Bear Valley creek from that flowing into the main Salmon river and Cape Horn creek to the summit of the Sawtooth mountains; thence southerly along the summit of the Sawtooth mountains (15 Ter. Ses. 26) to the headwaters of the North Fork of Boise river;

Southern boundary. Thence down the center of the channel of the North Fork of Boise river and the main Boise river to the place of beginning (3 Ter. Ses. 214).

County seat — Idaho City.

§ 31-111. Bonner county.

Bonner county is described as follows: beginning at a point where the township line between townships fifty-three (53) and fifty-four (54) north intersects the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Washington;

Southern boundary. Thence east on said township line between townships fifty-three (53) and fifty-four (54) north, to the northeast corner of township fifty-three (53) north, range three (3) west; thence north on the range line between sections thirty-six (36) and thirty-one (31), to the northeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township fifty-four (54) north, range three (3) west; thence east six (6) miles to the northeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township fifty-four (54) north, range two (2) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one (1) and two (2) west, to the southwest corner of township fifty-three (53) north, range one (1) west; thence east on the township line between townships fifty-two (52) and fifty-three (53) north, to the present county line between Kootenai and Shoshone counties; thence north along the west boundary line of Shoshone county to the northwest corner thereof; thence in an easterly direction along the summit of the Coeur d’Alene range of mountains to the west line of the state of Montana;

Eastern boundary. Thence north along the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Montana (R. C., section 23g) to a point where the south line of township sixty (60) north of range three (3) east intersects the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Montana;

Northern boundary. Thence west along said south line of township sixty (60) through ranges three (3), two (2), and one (1) east, and ranges one (1), two (2), and three (3) west, to the southwest corner of township sixty (60) north, range three (3) west; thence north along the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) west, to the point where the north line of township sixty-three (63) north, intersects the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) west; thence west along the said north line of township sixty-three (63) north, ranges four (4) and five (5) west, to a point on the state line between the states of Idaho and Washington where the same is intersected by the said north line of township sixty-three (63) north, range five (5) west (1915, ch. 7, section 2, p. 21);

Western boundary. Thence south along the boundary line between the state of Idaho and the state of Washington to the place of beginning (R. C., section 23g).

County seat — Sandpoint.

§ 31-112. Bonneville county.

Bonneville county is described as follows: beginning at the northeast corner of Bannock county;

Southern boundary. Thence west along the north line of Bannock county to the southwest corner of township four (4) south, range forty-two (42) east; thence north along the range line between ranges forty-one (41) and forty-two (42) east, to the southeast corner of township one (1) south, range forty-one (41) east; thence west along the township line between township one (1) and township two (2) south, to the southwest corner of township one (1) south, range forty (40) east; thence north along the range line to the base line; thence west along the base line to the southwest corner of township one (1) north, range thirty-eight (38) east; thence north along the range line to the northeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township one (1) north, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence west along section lines to the southwest corner of section fifteen (15), township one (1) north, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence north along the section line to the northwest corner of said section fifteen (15), township one (1) north, range thirty-seven (37) east; thence west, following the section lines to the range line between ranges thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34) east;

Western boundary. Thence north (1911, ch. 5, section 2, pp. 8, 9) to the line between townships three (3) and four (4) north;

Northern boundary. Thence east along the said township line between townships three (3) and four (4) north (1893, p. 94), to a point where the said line bisects the top or comb of the Big Hole mountain range; thence following along the top or comb of the said mountains in a southeasterly direction (R. C., section 23
l
) to the west line of the state of Wyoming;

Eastern boundary. Thence south along the west line of the state of Wyoming to the point of beginning (1911, ch. 5, section 2, p. 9).

County seat — Idaho Falls.

§ 31-113. Boundary county.

Boundary county is described as follows: beginning at a point on the state line between the states of Idaho and Washington where the same is intersected by the north line of township sixty-three (63) north, range five (5) west;

Southern boundary. Thence east along the said north line of township sixty-three (63) north, ranges five (5) and four (4) west, to the range line between ranges three (3) and four (4) west; thence south along said range line to the southwest corner of township sixty (60) north, range three (3) west; thence east along said south line of township sixty (60) through ranges three (3), two (2) and one (1) west, and ranges one (1), two (2) and three (3) east, to the state line between the state of Idaho and Montana;

Eastern boundary. Thence north along said state line to the international boundary line between the United States and the Dominion of Canada;

Northern boundary. Thence west along said international boundary to its junction with the state line between the states of Idaho and Washington;

Western boundary. Thence south along said state line to the point of beginning.

County seat — Bonners Ferry.

§ 31-114. Butte county.

Butte county is described as follows: beginning at the point, which, when surveyed, will be the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township one (1) north, range twenty-four (24) east;

Western boundary. Thence north to the summit of the range of mountains dividing the headwaters of Fish creek, Cottonwood creek and Copper creek from the waters of Lava creek, Champagne creek and Antelope creek; thence northwesterly along the summit of said range of mountains to the present boundary line between Blaine and Custer counties; thence in a northerly direction along and upon the boundary line of Custer county to the point of intersection with the southern boundary line of Lemhi county;

Northern boundary. Thence east along southern boundary line of Lemhi county and township line between townships ten (10) and eleven (11) north to the corner of sections three (3), four (4), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), townships ten (10) and eleven (11) north, range twenty-nine (29) east on western boundary line of Clark county; thence south along the section lines and western boundary line of Clark county, to the corner of sections three (3), four (4), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), townships seven (7) and eight (8) north, range twenty-nine (29) east, the southwest corner of Clark county; thence east along the southern boundary line of Clark county and township line between townships seven (7) and eight (8) north, to the corner of townships seven (7) and eight (8) north, ranges thirty-one (31) and thirty-two (32) east on west boundary of Jefferson county;

Eastern boundary. Thence south along range line between ranges thirty-one (31) and thirty-two (32) east, and western boundary line of Jefferson county, to the southeast corner of township four (4) north, range thirty-one (31) east, Boise meridian; thence westerly along the township line seven and eighty-one hundredths (7.81) chains to the closing corner of sections three (3) and four (4), township three (3) north, range thirty-two (32) east, Boise meridian; thence south along section lines to the corner of sections three (3), four (4), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), townships twenty-two (22) and three (3) north, range thirty-two (32) east, on the western boundary of Bingham county; thence west along the township line and western boundary line of Bingham county to the corner of townships two (2) and three (3) north, ranges thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) east, Boise meridian; thence south along the range line and western boundary line of Bingham county to the corner of township two (2) north, ranges thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) east, Boise meridian; thence west along the township line and western boundary line of Bingham county to the closing corner of sections three (3) and four (4), township one (1) north, range thirty (30) east; thence south along the section lines and western boundary line of Bingham county to the standard corner of sections thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), township one (1) north, range thirty (30) east; thence west to closing corner of sections three (3) and four (4), township one (1) south, range thirty (30) east; thence south along section lines and western boundary line of Bingham county to the corner of sections three (3), four (4), thirty-three (33) and thirty-four (34), townships one (1) and two (2) south, range thirty (30) east;